Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DEMENTIA GRANTS.new text end new text begin $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for regional and local dementia grants administered by the Minnesota Board on Aging under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.975, subdivision 11. new text end